Utah statutes.
4-24-29.   Commissioner authorized to cooperate with local governments, other states, or federal government in enforcement.

The commissioner is empowered with authority, if deemed necessary, to cooperate or enter into cooperative agreements with authorities in any city, town, or county within the state, or with federal authorities, or with authorities in another state for the purpose of securing assistance in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

